Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2557.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 4 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a part to read:PART IVSKILL GAMESChapter51. Preliminary Provisions53. Standards for Skill Games55. Miscellaneous ProvisionsCHAPTER 51PRELIMINARY PROVISIONSSec.5101. Scope of part.5102. Definitions.12345678910111213141516171819 5103. Prohibition.§ 5101. Scope of part.This part relates to skill video gaming.§ 5102. Definitions.Subject to additional definitions contained in subsequent provisions of this part which are applicable to specific provisions of this part, the following words and phrases when used in this part shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Associated equipment." Equipment or a mechanical, electromechanical or electronic contrivance, component or machine used in connection with a covered device or redemption terminal, including replacement parts, hardware and software."Board." The Pennsylvania Gaming Control Board."Bureau." The Bureau of Investigations and Enforcement of the board."Central control computer." A central site computer controlled by the department and accessible by the board to which all covered devices communicate for the purpose of auditing capacity and real-time information retrieval of the details of any financial event that occurs in the operation of a covered device or redemption terminal, including, but not limited to, coin-in, coin-out, ticket-in, ticket-out, jackpots, covered device and redemption terminal door openings and power failure and remote covered device and redemption terminal activation and disabling of covered devices or redemption terminals."Convenience store." A retail establishment that sells a limited selection of packaged foods, drug store items, food for consumption on or off the premises and basic supplies for the 20260HB2557PN3468 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 home and table that may include the retail sale of liquid fuels."Covered device." An electronic gaming device authorized under the laws of this Commonwealth that:(1) Accepts currency, credit or other value for play.(2) Provides the opportunity for a payout, whether in cash, voucher or other item of value.(3) Simulates or operates in a manner similar to a slot machine, including a device marketed or described as a skill game.(4) Is not any of the following:(i) A lottery game as that term is defined under the act of August 26, 1971 (P.L.351, No.91), known as the State Lottery Law.(ii) A gambling-style device or game made available for play at a family entertainment center.(iii) A coin-operated amusement game.(iv) A device used to play multiplayer video gaming competitions where the element of chance does not have a material effect on the play or outcome of the game.(v) A redemption terminal or other associated equipment necessary to operate or utilize a machine or device described in subparagraph (i).(vi) A slot machine, a hybrid slot machine or a skill slot machine currently in operation at a licensed facility under Part II (relating to gaming).(vii) A video gaming terminal currently in operation at a licensed facility under Part III (relating to video gaming).(viii) Any game determined by the board, in its sole discretion, to fall within subparagraph (i), (ii), (iii) 20260HB2557PN3468 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or (iv)."Department." The Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth. "Gaming area." The area of an establishment authorized to operate covered devices if covered devices and redemption terminals are installed for operation and play."Gas station." A place of business where motor vehicle fuel is sold and dispensed into the tanks of motor vehicles, either by means of a self-service or full-service pump."Manufacturer." A person that manufactures, build, rebuilds, fabricates, assembles, produces, programs, designs or makes modifications to a covered device, redemption terminal or associated equipment for use or play of covered devices in this Commonwealth for gaming purposes."Net loss." The total amount wagered by a player during a session minus the total amount returned to the player."Redemption terminal." The collective hardware, software, communications technology and other ancillary equipment used to facilitate the payment of cash or a cash equivalent to a player as a result of playing a covered device."Restricted area." A room or area of an establishment that is authorized to operate covered devices and specifically designated by the board as restricted or by the establishment as restricted in its board-approved internal controls."Service provider." A person that is not required to be licensed as a manufacturer or supplier under this part and provides goods or services to an establishment authorized to operate covered devices that directly relates to the operation and security of a covered device or redemption terminal. The term shall not include a person that supplies goods or services that, at the discretion of the board, does not impact the 20260HB2557PN3468 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 integrity of gaming, covered devices, or the connection of covered devices to the central control computer system, including:(1) seating to accompany covered devices; and (2) structural or cosmetic renovations, improvements or other alterations to a gaming area."Session." A continuous period of play on a covered device, beginning when a player initiates play and ending when the player cashes out or remains inactive for more than three minutes."Supplier." A person that sells, leases, offers or otherwise provides, distributes or services a covered device, redemption terminal or associated equipment for use or play of covered devices in this Commonwealth."Weapon." Anything readily capable of lethal use and possessed under circumstances not manifestly appropriate for lawful uses which it may have. The term includes a firearm which is not loaded or lacks a clip or other component to render it immediately operable, and components which can readily be assembled into a weapon.§ 5103. Prohibition.(a) Covered devices.--On and after the effective date of this subsection, a person may not place a covered device into operation unless the covered device complies with this part.(b) Applicability.--This part shall apply to all covered devices authorized by law for operation within this Commonwealth.CHAPTER 53STANDARDS FOR SKILL GAMESSec.20260HB2557PN3468 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 5301. Central control computer system.5302. Testing and certification of covered devices.5303. Player identification and access.5304. Player protection standards.5305. Self-exclusion.5306. Prohibited design features.5307. Location and access restrictions.5308. Local control.5309. Employee and operational protections.§ 5301. Central control computer system.(a) Duty of department.--To facilitate the auditing and security programs critical to the integrity of covered devices in this Commonwealth, the department shall have overall control of covered devices. A covered device shall:(1) be linked, at an appropriate time to be determined by the department, to a central control computer under the control of the department and accessible by the board to provide auditing program capacity and individual terminal information as approved by the department; and(2) include real-time information retrieval and terminal activation and disabling programs.(b) System capabilities.--The central control computer employed by the department shall be capable of all of the following:(1) Recording all wagers, payouts and session durations in real time.(2) Tracking player activity where player identification is required.(3) Enforcing loss limits, time limits and self-exclusion procedures.20260HB2557PN3468 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) Allowing the board to disable noncompliant covered devices remotely.(5) Employing widely accepted gaming industry protocol to facilitate a covered device manufacturer's ability to communicate with the Statewide system.(6) Verifying software, detecting alterations in payout and detecting other methods of fraud in all aspects of the operation of covered devices.(7) Meeting all reporting and control requirements as prescribed by the board and department.(8) The delivery of a system that provides centralized issuance of cash redemption tickets and facilitates the acceptance of the tickets by covered devices and redemption terminals.(9) Receiving and reporting all information required under section 5503 (relating to research) to the board for research purposes.(10) Achieving other capabilities as determined by the department in consultation with the board.(c) Certification.--A person may not operate a covered device unless the board has certified the covered device as being compatible with a central control computer system that has been employed by the department.(d) Existing central control computer system.--The department may alter or utilize the central control computer system controlled by the department under section 1323 (relating to central control computer system) or 3309 (relating to central control computer system) to fulfill the requirements of this section.§ 5302. Testing and certification of covered devices. 20260HB2557PN3468 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Requirement.--A covered device or redemption terminal may not be made available for use in this Commonwealth prior to being tested and certified by the board in accordance with this section.(b) Covered device specifications.--The board shall test and certify whether a covered device meets the following specifications:(1) The covered device shall have the ability to be linked to the central control computer.(2) The covered device shall be marked with an irremovable identification plate that is placed in a conspicuous location on the exterior of the covered device. The identification plate shall contain the name of the manufacturer and the serial and model numbers of the covered device.(3) The covered device shall prominently display the rules of play either on the covered device face or screen.(4) The covered device may not dispense cash, tokens or anything of value, except redemption tickets which shall only be exchangeable for cash at a redemption terminal or reinserted into another covered device located in the same gaming area as the covered device.(5) The cost of a credit shall only be 1¢, 5¢, 10¢ or 25¢.(6) The maximum wager per individual game may not exceed $5.(7) The maximum prize per individual game may not exceed $1,000.(8) The covered device shall be designed and manufactured with total accountability to include gross 20260HB2557PN3468 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 proceeds, net profits, winning percentages and other information the board requires.(9) The covered device shall pay out a minimum of 85% of the amount wagered.(10) Other specifications the board requires. (c) Redemption terminal specifications.--The board shall test and certify whether a redemption terminal meets the following specifications:(1) The redemption terminal shall be marked with an irremovable identification plate that is placed in a conspicuous location on the exterior of the redemption terminal. The identification plate shall contain the name of the manufacturer and the serial and model number of the redemption terminal.(2) The redemption terminal shall only accept redemption tickets from covered machines located in the same gaming area.(3) The redemption terminal shall be designed and manufactured with total accountability to record information the board requires.(4) Other specifications the board requires. (d) Use of other State standards.-- (1) The board may determine, in its discretion, whether the covered device or redemption terminal testing and certification standards of another jurisdiction within the United States in which a manufacturer is licensed are comprehensive and thorough and provide similar adequate safeguards as those required by this part.(2) If the board makes the determination under paragraph (1), the board may permit an establishment to deploy the 20260HB2557PN3468 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 covered devices or redemption terminals which have met the covered device or redemption terminal testing and certification standards in the other jurisdiction without undergoing the full testing and certification process by the board's testing facility.(3) In the event covered devices or redemption terminals are licensed in the other jurisdiction, the board may determine to use an abbreviated process requiring only that information determined by the board to be necessary to consider the issuance of a covered device or redemption terminal certification to the applicant.(e) Private testing.--The board may rely on the certification of a covered device or redemption terminal that has met the testing and certification standards of one or more board-approved independent private testing and certification facilities.(f) Testing and certification fee.--A manufacturer of a covered device or redemption terminal must pay a fee for the testing and certification of a covered device or redemption terminal. The fee shall be an amount established by the board according to a schedule adopted by the board.(g) Central control computer compatibility.--The board shall ensure that all covered devices certified and approved for use in this Commonwealth are compatible and comply with the central control computer and protocol specifications approved by the department.§ 5303. Player identification and access.A covered device:(1) Shall require player identity authentication prior to a player beginning play on the device through a 20260HB2557PN3468 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 government-issued identification card or a board-approved player account system. A covered device shall deny access to a person who does not have a valid form of identification or is identified as being under 21 years of age.(2) May not be capable of facilitating anonymous play, except that the board may establish thresholds below which limited anonymous play is permitted, provided that loss limits remain enforceable.§ 5304. Player protection standards.(a) Play speed.--A covered device shall implement a minimum waiting period of at least five seconds between initiation of plays by a player.(b) Suspension of play.--(1) A covered device shall automatically suspend play for at least 30 seconds after a player has exceeded 15 minutes of continuous play on the covered device.(2) Upon each automatic suspension of play, the device shall display a prominent reality check message that provides the following information:(i) The amount of time that has elapsed since the player began the current session.(ii) The amount of money that the player has wagered during the current session.(iii) Any other information determined to be necessary by the board.(c) Loss limits.--Prior to initiating play, a player shall establish a daily loss limit. During a session, a player may reduce, but not increase, the established daily loss limit. A default daily loss limit may not exceed $250, except that the board may promulgate regulations to establish lower default 20260HB2557PN3468 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 daily loss limits.(d) Session transparency.--A covered device shall continuously display the following information:(1) The amount of time that has elapsed since the player began the current session.(2) The amount of money that the player has wagered during the current session.(3) The amount of money that the player has won during the current session.(4) The net loss that the player has incurred during the current session.(5) Any other information determined to be necessary by the board.(e) Available materials.--An establishment that places a covered device on its premises for play shall:(1) Conspicuously post a sign similar to the following statement within the location where covered devices are placed:If you or someone you know has a gambling problem, help is available. Call (Toll-free telephone number) or Text (Toll-free telephone number).The toll-free telephone number required to be posted under this paragraph shall be the same number maintained by the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs or successor agency under section 3310 (relating to Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs or successor agency).(2) Conspicuously post a sign within the location where covered devices are placed notifying individuals that access to covered devices are limited to individuals who are over 21 years of age.20260HB2557PN3468 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) Have available access to materials regarding compulsive and problem gambling assistance. The materials shall include a uniform, Statewide handout developed by the board, in consultation with the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs or successor agency. The available materials shall be displayed conspicuously within the area that covered devices are available for play.(f) Payment method.--A covered device shall only accept cash as a payment method for play of a covered device. A covered device may not accept a credit card or debit card for play of a covered device.(g) Mandatory training.--(1) The board's Office of Compulsive and Problem Gambling, in consultation with the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs or successor agency, shall develop a mandatory training program for employees and management of an establishment authorized to operate covered devices. The training program shall address responsible gaming and other compulsive and problem gambling issues related to covered devices.(2) The board may use the mandatory training established under section 3706 (relating to compulsive and problem gambling) to carry out paragraph (1).(3) The board shall establish a fee to cover the cost of the mandatory training program.(4) At least one employee of an establishment authorized to operate covered devices, who has completed the training program required under this subsection, shall be located on the premises and supervising the gaming area during all hours that covered devices are available for play.20260HB2557PN3468 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (h) Prohibited promotion.--An individual or entity may not advertise or promote a covered device in a manner intended to target individuals under the age of 21.§ 5305. Self-exclusion.(a) Establishment of list.--The board shall provide by regulation for the establishment of a list of individuals self-excluded from using covered devices within this Commonwealth. An individual may request placement on the list of self-excluded individuals by:(1) acknowledging in a manner to be established by the board that the individual is a problem gambler;(2) agreeing that, during any period of voluntary exclusion, the individual may not collect any winning or recover any loss resulting from a covered device play within an authorized location and the individual may be subject to arrest for trespass; and(3) agreeing to another condition established by the board.(b) Regulations.--The regulations of the board shall establish:(1) Procedures for placement on and removal from the list of a self-excluded individual.(2) Procedures for the transmittal to establishments authorized to operate covered devices of identifying information concerning a self-excluded individual and shall require establishments to establish reasonable procedures designed at a minimum to prevent entry of a self-excluded individual into the gaming area of an establishment.(c) Liability.--An establishment authorized to operate covered devices or any of the establishment's employees shall 20260HB2557PN3468 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 not be liable to a self-excluded individual or to another party in a judicial proceeding for harm, monetary or otherwise, which may arise as a result of:(1) the failure of the establishment to withhold use of a covered device or restore covered device privileges to the self-excluded individual; or(2) otherwise permitting or not permitting the self-excluded individual to use a covered device within the establishment's premises while on the list of self-excluded individuals.§ 5306. Prohibited design features.(a) Specifications.--A covered device may not:(1) Display outcomes designed to appear as near-wins when the outcome is a loss.(2) Provide celebratory audio or visual feedback for outcomes resulting in a net loss.(3) Misrepresent the role of skill in determining outcomes.(4) Include prohibited psychological or behavioral design elements as determined by the board under subsection (b).(b) Regulations.--The board shall promulgate regulations defining acceptable representations of skill and additional prohibited psychological or behavioral design elements.§ 5307. Location and access restrictions.(a) Prohibited locations.--A person may not place a covered device on the premises of a gas station or a convenience store.(b) Designated area.--(1) An establishment that is accessible to individuals under 21 years of age shall ensure that covered devices are 20260HB2557PN3468 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 placed in a segregated location that is not accessible to individuals under 21 years of age.(2) An individual under 21 years of age may not be permitted to enter the segregated gaming location or play a covered device.(3) A visibly intoxicated person may not be permitted to play a covered device.(c) Permitted locations.--A covered device may only be located in and available for play in the following locations:(1) On the premises of an establishment that holds a valid license to sell liquor or malt or brewed beverages under the act of April 12, 1951 (P.L.90, No.21), known as the Liquor Code, except for an establishment that is prohibited from placing a covered device on the premises under subsection (a).(2) A gaming area capable of providing controlled access to covered devices to individuals over the age of 21 and that has been approved by the board.(d) Maximum number of devices.--An establishment eligible to operate a covered device under subsection (c) may not operate more than five covered devices within a single establishment.(e) Regulations.--The board may establish and promulgate regulations to establish additional restrictions relating to locations where covered devices may be placed.§ 5308. Local control.(a) Ordinances and resolutions.--A municipality may enact an ordinance or resolution to:(1) Restrict the number of covered devices within the municipality's jurisdiction.(2) Establish zoning requirements relating to the 20260HB2557PN3468 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 placement of covered devices.(3) Prohibit covered devices from being operated within the municipality's jurisdiction.(b) Construction.--Nothing in this part shall be construed to preempt an ordinance or resolution of a political subdivision that creates more restrictive rules on covered devices, except where expressly provided.§ 5309. Employee and operational protections.(a) Controlled payout systems.-- (1) An establishment authorized to operate covered devices shall ensure that all payments of player winnings are conducted exclusively through a secure and controlled system, including a staffed cashier station, redemption terminal or verified cashless funds transfer system.(2) An employee may not make a direct, unsecured cash payout from a covered device or general register.(b) Secure cash handling facilities.--An establishment authorized to operate covered devices shall maintain a physically secure cashier area in or immediately adjacent to the gaming area for the handling of funds. The cashier area shall:(1) Be designed and constructed to provide maximum security for employees, patrons and assets.(2) Include controlled access points or physical barriers.(3) Include a manually triggered alarm system accessible to employees.(4) Be subject to continuous surveillance coverage. (c) Cash control and storage requirements.-- (1) Cash maintained for payout purposes shall be held on a fixed or imprest basis in an amount sufficient to meet 20260HB2557PN3468 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 anticipated payouts.(2) Excess funds shall be transferred to a restricted- access secure storage area.(3) The counting of proceeds shall occur in a designated secure counting area separate from public access.(d) Internal controls.--An establishment authorized to operate covered devices shall establish, implement and maintain written internal control systems governing the counting, storage and transport of all proceeds. The internal control systems shall:(1) Be submitted to the board for approval. (2) Include employee safety protocols during cash handling.(3) Require supervisory oversight or dual-control procedures for counting activities.(e) Transaction recording and reconciliation.--An establishment authorized to operate covered devices shall maintain a daily reconciliation report that includes:(1) A complete electronic record of all wagers and payouts.(2) Documentation sufficient to verify discrepancies. (3) Audit trails accessible to the board and law enforcement.(f) Minimum security staffing.--An establishment authorized to operate covered devices shall maintain adequate security staffing based on the size, layout and number of covered devices present on the establishment's premises. Staffing levels shall, at all times, ensure: (1) The safety of employees and patrons.(2) The security of restricted areas and financial 20260HB2557PN3468 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 assets.(g) Security supervision.--An establishment authorized to operate covered devices shall designate an individual responsible for security at the establishment. The designated individual shall manage the physical safety of employees and patrons, the safeguarding of assets and the prevention of illegal activity within the establishment.(h) Surveillance systems.--An establishment authorized to operate covered devices shall implement and maintain a surveillance system that provides continuous monitoring of gaming areas, cashier areas and restricted areas and shall retain and make the surveillance records available to the board and law enforcement upon request.(i) Exclusion and safety protections.-- (1) An establishment authorized to operate covered devices shall maintain and enforce an exclusion list prohibiting access to the establishment by:(i) Individuals who pose a threat to the safety of employees or patrons.(ii) Individuals who have engaged in criminal or fraudulent conduct related to gaming.(2) An individual may not possess a weapon within an establishment authorized to operate covered devices, except as authorized for law enforcement personnel.(j) Duty to avoid harmful associations.--An establishment authorized to operate covered devices has an affirmative duty to avoid agreements or relationships with any person whose background or conduct poses a threat to employee safety, public welfare or the integrity of gaming. (k) Licensing of manufacturers and suppliers.--A 20260HB2557PN3468 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 manufacturer, supplier or service provider of covered devices shall be subject to licensing or registration requirements as determined by the board. (l) Inspections.--An establishment authorized to operate covered devices shall be subject to periodic and unannounced inspections by the board and law enforcement to ensure compliance with this section.CHAPTER 55MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONSSec.5501. Transfer to Compulsive and Problem Gambling Treatment Fund.5502. Enforcement.5503. Research.5504. Regulations.§ 5501. Transfer to Compulsive and Problem Gambling Treatment Fund.Upon the enactment of State law that levies a tax on the gross terminal revenue of covered devices, no less than 3% of gross terminal revenue collected by the Commonwealth from covered devices shall be transferred into the Compulsive and Problem Gambling Treatment Fund established in section 1509 (relating to compulsive and problem gambling program).§ 5502. Enforcement.(a) Powers and duties of bureau.--The bureau shall have the following powers and duties:(1) Enforce this part.(2) Investigate persons for noncriminal violations of this part, including potential violations referred to the bureau by the board or other person.20260HB2557PN3468 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) Monitor gaming operations to ensure compliance with this part.(4) Refer possible criminal violations of this part to the Pennsylvania State Police. The bureau does not have the power to arrest a person for a violation of this part.(5) Cooperate in the investigation and prosecution of criminal violations related to this part.(b) Sanctions.--In addition to any other penalty authorized by law, the board may impose the following sanctions:(1) Disable a noncompliant covered device.(2) Issue a civil penalty of up to $25,000 per violation.(3) Enter cease and desist orders which specify the conduct which is to be discontinued, altered or implemented by an establishment.(c) Separate violations.--Each day that an establishment violates a provision of this part shall constitute a separate violation and may be subject to additional penalties under subsection (b).§ 5503. Research. (a) Requirement.--A covered device shall supply the board with customer tracking data collected or generated by loyalty programs, player tracking software, player card systems or any other information system. The board shall contract with an experienced nonprofit research entity to develop an anonymizing system that automatically removes from the data:(1) Personally identifying information, including player name, street address and the last 4 digits of a player's zip code.(2) Game identifying information, including the game 20260HB2557PN3468 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 name and the manufacturer company that developed the covered device.(b) Retention of player characteristic information.--The data collected under this section shall retain information on player characteristics, including, but not limited to:(1) Gender. (2) Age. (3) Region of residence. (c) Retention of player behavior information.--The data collected under this section shall retain information on player behavior including:(1) Frequency of play. (2) Length of play. (3) Speed of play. (4) Amounts wagered. (5) Other information as required by the board. (d) Use of anonymized data.--The board shall convey the anonymized data to a research facility, and the research facility shall make the data available to qualified researchers for the purposes of:(1) Conducting analyses that improve understanding of how gambling addiction develops and progresses.(2) Developing evidence-based harm minimization strategies.(3) Developing evidence-based systems to monitor, detect and intervene in high-risk gambling.(e) Reports.--The commission shall request reports on researcher analyses of the data collected under this section and may directly initiate studies assessing the effectiveness of any specific measures, programs or interventions through which the 20260HB2557PN3468 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Commonwealth has implemented in gaming operations.§ 5504. Regulations.(a) Duty of board.--No later than 180 days after the effective date of this subsection, the board shall promulgate regulations necessary to implement this part.(b) Duties of board.--The board shall:(1) Require that each establishment authorized to operate a covered device prohibits minors or visibly intoxicated persons from operating or using a covered device.(2) Promulgate rules and regulations governing the advertisement of a covered device, provided that:(i) The board shall require all advertisements to display or reference the toll-free problem gambling telephone number maintained by the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs or successor agency under section 3310 (b) (relating to duties of Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs or successor agency).(ii) The advertising, promotion or marketing of a covered device do not target and are not intended to appeal to an individual who is under 21 years of age.Section 2. Not later than 10 days after the enactment of an act that authorizes covered devices, as defined under 4 Pa.C.S. § 5102, to be played in this Commonwealth, the Secretary of the Commonwealth shall transmit a notice to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.Section 3. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) Section 2 of this act shall take effect immediately.(2) This section shall take effect immediately.(3) The remainder of this act shall take effect upon 20260HB2557PN3468 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 publication of the notice under section 2 of this act.20260HB2557PN3468 - 24 - 1